Louisiana, session 2026, HB987.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:1492 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1492. Louisiana Geological Survey
A. The Louisiana Geological Survey shall be located within the Energy
Institute at Louisiana State University and Agricultural and Mechanical College and
shall be a part of that institution. The Louisiana Geological Survey shall maintain
current surface and subsurface geological surveys of the entire state and shall work
in cooperation with other state entities and other political subdivisions as appropriate
and required by law.
B. The Louisiana Geological Survey shall be responsible for the following:
(1) Maintaining current surface and subsurface geological surveys of the
entire state.
(2) Coordinating with the office of technology services for the operation and
maintenance of information technology provided for in R.S. 39:15.3 for the storage,
management, and modeling of surface and subsurface geological and geographic
information system data.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 987 ENROLLED
(3) Coordinating with the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries regarding
the storage and maintenance of surveys conducted pursuant to R.S. 56:30.4 and 30.5.
(4) Coordinating with the Department of Conservation and Energy and
specifically the offices of state resources, permitting and compliance, and energy
regarding the storage and maintenance of any surveys or other geological data within
the jurisdiction of the department pursuant to R.S. 30:4 et seq.
C. The Energy Institute shall coordinate with and provide periodic updates
to the Natural Resources Commission regarding the storage and maintenance of the
surveys.
D. Cooperative endeavor agreements may be used to implement this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 36:358(E)(2) and (G) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§358. Offices; purposes and functions
* * *
E. The office of state resources shall:
* * *
(2) Work in cooperation with the Center for Energy Studies Institute to
maintain current surface and subsurface geological surveys of the state, or otherwise
at the discretion of the secretary or his designee; conduct geological mapping;
prepare geological hazards assessments and resource inventories; and conduct
process investigations and related studies.
* * *
G. The office of energy shall organize, plan, supervise, direct, administer,
execute, and be responsible for the functions and programs relating to the
deployment and operation of alternative energy infrastructure in this state in a
manner that results in affordable and reliable energy. The office of energy shall also
work in cooperation with the Center for Energy Studies Institute to create and carry
out a central, comprehensive, and unified energy data and information program
which will collect, evaluate, assemble, analyze, and disseminate data and information
which is relevant to energy resource reserves, energy production, demand, and
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 987 ENROLLED
technology, and related economic and statistical information, or which is relevant to
the adequacy of energy resources to meet demands in the near and longer term future
of the state. The office of energy shall work to provide the department and the
Natural Resources Commission with technical assistance and expertise in matters
related to energy and natural resources and shall also work to identify policy options
relative to energy related matters upon request. Finally, the office of energy shall
coordinate with academic and research institutions who possess specialized expertise
in areas related to energy and natural resources on behalf of the department.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.